02_Morphology/chv.twol
Alphabet
  а ӑ е ё ӗ и о у ӳ ы э ю я б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ
  А Ӑ Е Ё Ӗ И О У Ӳ Ы Э Ю Я Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Й Ь Ъ 
 %{A%}:а %{A%}:е
 %{М%}:м %{М%}:0
 !%{М%}:%!
 %{Ӑ%}:ӑ %{Ӑ%}:ӗ %{Ӑ%}:0
 %{ъ%}:0
 %>:0 %>:%> ! for debugging purposes
;

Sets

BackVow = ӑ а ы о у я ё ю %{ъ%} ;

FrontVow = ӗ э и ӳ е ;

Cns = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ ;

ArchiCns = %{М%} ;

ArchiVow = %{Ӑ%} ;

Rules

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"
%{A%}:а <=> BackVow: [ Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ;

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {Ӑ}"
%{Ӑ%}:ӑ <=> BackVow: [ ArchiCns: | Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ;
        except
                %{М%}: %>: _ н ;
                [ BackVow: | FrontVow: ] %>: _ ;

"Null surface {Ӑ} in plural genetive and after stem vowel"
%{Ӑ%}:0 <=> %{М%}: %>: _ н ;
            [ BackVow: | FrontVow: ] %>: _ ;

"Null surface %{М%} if {Ӑ}н follows"
%{М%}:0 <=> _ %>: ArchiVow: н ;

"Remove morpheme boundaries"
%>:0 <=> _ ;
